Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.010

Prison riot—Penalty.

(1) Whenever two or more inmates of a correctional institution assemble for any purpose, and act in such a manner as to disturb the good order of the institution and contrary to the commands of the officers of the institution, by the use of force or violence, or the threat thereof, and whether acting in concert or not, they shall be guilty of prison riot.

(2) Every inmate of a correctional institution who is guilty of prison riot or of voluntarily participating therein by being present at, or by instigating, aiding, or abetting the same, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional institution for not less than one year nor more than ten years, which shall be in addition to the sentence being served.

[ 2003 c 53 s 53; 1995 c 314 s 1; 1955 c 241 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.